Utah statutes.
23-20-24.   Failure to stop vehicle when ordered -- Operation of vehicle in
dangerous manner -- Attempt to flee officer -- Penalty.
It is unlawful for any driver, who having received a visual or audible signal
from a conservation officer to bring his vehicle to a stop, to operate his
vehicle in willful or wanton disregard of the signal so as to endanger or harm
a conservation officer or other person, to interfere with the operation of the
conservation officer's vehicle, or any other vehicle or to increase his speed
and attempt to flee or elude the conservation officer.   A person who violates
this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor; a fine imposed under this
section shall be not less than $250, and a penalty of imprisonment shall be
for not less than 60 days.
